Massachusetts, session 194th, S2398.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts Bay
Transportation Authority shall place accessible naloxone at all MBTA Blue Line, Green Line,
Orange Line and Red Line stations. Each of the stations shall have 2 freestanding unalarmed
naloxone boxes. Each box shall contain 2 units of 4 milligram intranasal naloxone spray. The
boxes shall be checked daily for the purpose of replacing used naloxone. Flyers shall be mounted
around the naloxone box with information relating to naloxone training. Instructions on how to
use naloxone in the event of an emergency shall be displayed near the boxes. The Massachusetts
Bay Transportation Authority shall file a report on the efficacy of the program with the clerks of
the senate and house of representatives and the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on
mental health, substance use and recovery. The report shall include an evaluation of the benefits
and costs of the program and make recommendations on improving and expanding it to other
of 2

modes of transportation. The report shall be filed no sooner than 12 months after initiation of the
program but not later than 18 months after initiation.
of 2